lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/testCompressed.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abcdefghijklmopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ

FLAG long

AF 5
AF AA
AF BB
AF CC
AF DD
AF EE

SFX AA Y 3
SFX AA   0     e         n
SFX AA   0     e         t
SFX AA   0     e         h

SFX CC Y 2
SFX CC   0     d/3       c
SFX CC   0     c         b

SFX DD Y 1
SFX DD   0     s         o

SFX EE Y 1
SFX EE   0     d         o

PFX BB Y 1
PFX BB   0     s         o
